Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1237
Special law or local ordinance; minimum required standard.

The provisions of sections 28-1213 to 28-1239 and the rules adopted pursuant thereto shall be the minimum standard required and shall supersede any special law or local ordinance inconsistent therewith, and no local ordinance inconsistent therewith shall be adopted, but nothing herein contained shall prevent the enactment by local law or ordinance of additional requirements and restrictions.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 269.